Tennessee, session 114, SB0438.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-211-873, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(c) The department shall publish the report required by subsection (a) on its
website.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0438
002106
- 1 -